Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle A. Primary elections.

§ 23-15-331.
Duties of state executive committee.

It shall be the duty of the state executive committee of each political party to furnish to each county executive committee, not less than fifty (50) days prior to the election, the names of all state and state district candidates and all candidates for legislative districts composed of more than one county or parts of more than one county who have qualified as provided by law, and in accordance with the requirements of Section 23-15-333 a sample of the official ballot to be used in the primary, the general form of which shall be followed as nearly as practicable.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-1-39 [Codes, 1906, § 3704; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6396; 1930, § 5881; 1942, § 3123; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 6; Laws, 1978, ch. 391, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 401, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 102, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-333.
Duties of county executive committee; order in which titles of various offices and names of candidates are to be listed on the ballot.

The county executive committee shall have printed all necessary ballots, for use in primary elections. The county executive committee shall have printed all necessary absentee ballots forty-five (45) days before the election as required by law. The ballots shall contain the names of all the candidates to be voted for at the election, and there shall be left on each ballot one (1) blank space under the title of each office for which a nominee is to be elected; and in the event of the death of any candidate whose name shall have been printed on the ballot, the name of the candidate duly substituted in the place of the deceased candidate may be written in such blank space by the voter. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the order in which the titles to the various offices shall be printed, and the size, print and quality of the paper of the ballot is left to the discretion of the county executive committee. Provided, however, that in all cases the arrangement of the names of the candidates for each office shall be alphabetical. No ballot shall be used except those so printed.

The titles for the various offices shall be listed in the following order:

Candidates, electors or delegates for the following national offices:

President of the United States of America;

United States Senator or United States Representative;

Candidates for the following statewide offices: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, State Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, Commissioner of Insurance;

Candidates for the following state district offices: Mississippi Transportation Commissioner, Public Service Commissioner, District Attorney;

Candidates for the following legislative offices: Senator and House of Representatives;

Candidates for countywide office;

Candidates for county district office.

The order in which the titles for the various offices are listed within each of the categories listed in paragraphs (e) and (f) are left to the discretion of the county executive committee. Candidates’ names shall be listed alphabetically under each office by the candidate’s last name.

If after the deadline to qualify as a candidate for an office, only one (1) person has duly qualified to be a candidate for the office in the primary election, the name of that person shall be placed on the ballot; provided, however, that if not more than one (1) person has duly qualified to be a candidate for each office on the primary election ballot, the election for all offices on the ballot shall be dispensed with and the appropriate executive committee shall declare each candidate as the party nominee if the candidate meets all the qualifications to hold the office.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the county executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the circuit clerk or the county election commission authorizing the circuit clerk or the county election commission to perform any of the duties required of the county executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the county executive committee and the circuit clerk or the chair of the county election commission, as appropriate. The county executive committee shall notify the state executive committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of such agreement.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the municipal executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission authorizing the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission to perform any of the duties required of the municipal executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the municipal executive committee and the municipal clerk or the chair of the municipal election commission, as appropriate. The municipal executive committee shall notify the state executive committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of such agreement.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3124 [Codes, 1906, § 3710; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6402, § 5882; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 103; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 7; Laws, 2001, ch. 523, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 74, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-335.
Duties of person designated by county executive committee to distribute ballots.

The county executive committee shall designate a person whose duty it shall be to distribute all necessary ballots for use in a primary election, and shall designate one (1) among the poll managers at each polling place to receive and receipt for the blank ballots to be used at that place. When the blank ballots are delivered to a local poll manager, the distributor shall take from the local poll manager a receipt therefor signed in duplicate by both the distributor and the poll manager, one (1) of which receipts the distributor shall deliver to the circuit clerk and the other shall be retained by the local poll manager and the last mentioned duplicate receipt shall be enclosed in the ballot box with the voted ballots when the polls have been closed and the votes have been counted. The printer of the ballots shall take a receipt from the distributor of the ballots for the total number of the blank ballots delivered to the distributor. The printer shall secure all ballots printed by him or her in such a safe manner that no person can procure them or any of them, and he or she shall deliver no blank ballot or ballots to any person except the distributor above mentioned, and then only upon his or her receipt therefor as above specified. The distributor of the blank ballots shall so securely hold the same that no person can obtain any of them, and he or she shall not deliver any of them to any person other than to the authorized local poll managers and upon their respective receipts therefor. The executive committee shall see to it that the total blank ballots delivered to the distributor, shall correspond with the total of the receipts executed by the local poll managers.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the county executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the circuit clerk or the county election commission authorizing the circuit clerk or the county election commission to perform any of the duties required of the county executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the county executive committee and the circuit clerk or the chair of the county election commission, as appropriate. The county executive committee shall notify the state executive committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of such agreement.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the municipal executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission authorizing the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission to perform any of the duties required of the municipal executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the municipal executive committee and the municipal clerk or the chair of the municipal election commission, as appropriate. The municipal executive committee shall notify the state executive committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of such agreement.

Any person charged with any of the duties prescribed in this section who shall willfully or with culpable carelessness violate the same shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-39 [Codes, 1942, § 3177; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 104; Laws, 2001, ch. 523, § 6, eff June 20, 2001 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section); Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 177, eff from and after July 1, 2017.